Washington statutes.
RCW 10.43.030

Conviction or acquittal in other county.

Whenever, upon the trial of any person for a crime, it shall appear that the defendant has already been acquitted or convicted upon the merits, of the same crime, in a court having jurisdiction of such offense in another county of this state, such former acquittal or conviction is a sufficient defense.

[ 1909 c 249 s 20; RRS s 2272.]